Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.06
Licensed inspector, defined.

Licensed inspector means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to conduct inspections and sample for the presence of lead in dust and soil for the purposes of abatement clearance testing.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1266.